Utah statutes.
53A-20b-203.   Bond issuance.

(1) (a)  The state may not alter, impair, or limit the rights of bondholders or persons contracting with a qualifying charter school until the bonds, including interest and other contractual obligations, are fully met and discharged.

(b)  Nothing in this chapter precludes an alteration, impairment, or limitation if provision is made by law for the protection of bondholders or persons entering into contracts with a qualifying charter school.

(2)  The authority may require a qualifying charter school to vest in the authority the right to enforce any covenant made to secure bonds issued under the credit enhancement program by making appropriate provisions in the indenture related to the qualifying charter school's bonds.

(3)  The authority may require a qualifying charter school to make covenants and agreements in indentures or in a reimbursement agreement to protect the interests of the state and to secure repayment to the state of any money received by the qualifying charter school from an appropriation to restore amounts deposited in the qualifying charter school's debt service reserve fund to the debt service reserve fund requirement.

(4)  The authority may charge a fee to administer the issuance of bonds for a qualifying charter school.



Enacted by Chapter 201, 2012 General Session

